District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.12

Determination of voting power of patron member.

(a)

The organic rules may allocate voting power among patron members on the basis of one or a combination of the following:

(1)

One member, one vote;

(2)

Use or patronage;

(3)

Equity; or

(4)

If a patron member is a cooperative, the number of its patron members.

(b)

The organic rules may provide for the allocation of patron member voting power by districts or class, or any combination thereof.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1005.11.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 512 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Editor's Notes